Washington statutes.
RCW 43.115.900

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 34.

If any provision of this act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 34 s 7.]